Florida, session 2026, SB292.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 17 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 18 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 19 public records.â 20 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 21 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 22 a.ââAppellate court clerkâ means a person appointed as a 23 clerk of the Florida Supreme Court pursuant to s. 3(c), Art. V 24 of the State Constitution, a person appointed as a clerk of a 25 district court of appeal pursuant to s. 4(c), Art. V of the 26 State Constitution, or a court employee assigned to the 2610 or 27 2620 class code. 28 b.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 29 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 30 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 31 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 32 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 33 property information that may reveal the home address. 34 c.b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned 35 to the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 36 d.c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 37 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 38 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 39 communications devices. 40 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 41 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 42 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 43 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 44 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 45 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 46 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 47 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 48 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 49 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 50 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 51 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 52 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 53 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 54 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 55 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 56 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 57 Constitution. 58 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 59 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 60 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 61 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 62 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 63 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 64 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 65 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 66 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 67 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 68 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 69 Constitution. 70 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 71 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 72 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 73 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 74 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 75 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 76 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 77 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 78 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 79 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 80 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 81 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 82 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 83 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 84 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 85 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 86 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 87 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 88 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 89 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 90 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 91 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 92 county court judges, and of current judicial assistants and 93 appellate court clerks; the names, home addresses, telephone 94 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 95 and children of current or former justices and judges and of 96 current judicial assistants and appellate court clerks; and the 97 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 98 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 99 current judicial assistants and appellate court clerks are 100 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 101 Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 102 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 103 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031 2028, unless reviewed 104 and saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 105 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 106 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 107 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 108 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 109 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 110 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 111 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 112 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 113 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 114 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 115 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 116 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 117 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 118 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 119 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 120 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 121 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 122 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 123 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 124 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 125 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 126 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 127 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 128 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 129 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 130 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 131 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 132 Constitution. 133 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 134 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 135 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 136 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 137 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 138 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 139 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 140 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 141 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 142 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 143 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 144 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 145 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 146 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 147 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 148 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 149 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 150 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 151 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 152 Constitution. 153 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 154 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 155 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 156 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 157 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 158 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 159 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 160 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 161 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 162 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 163 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 164 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 165 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 166 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 167 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 168 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 169 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 170 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 171 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 172 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 173 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 174 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 175 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 176 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 177 Constitution. 178 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 179 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 180 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 181 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 182 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 183 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 184 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 185 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 186 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 187 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 188 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 189 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 190 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 191 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 192 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 193 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 194 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 195 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 196 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 197 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 198 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 199 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 200 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 201 Constitution. 202 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 203 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 204 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 205 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 206 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 207 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 208 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 209 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 210 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 211 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 212 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 213 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 214 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 215 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 216 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 217 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 218 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 219 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 220 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 221 the State Constitution. 222 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 223 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 224 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 225 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 226 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 227 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 228 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 229 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 230 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 231 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 232 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 233 Constitution. 234 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 235 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 236 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 237 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 238 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 239 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 240 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 241 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 242 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 243 Constitution. 244 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 245 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 246 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 247 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 248 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 249 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 250 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 251 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 252 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 253 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 254 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 255 Constitution. 256 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 257 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 258 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 259 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 260 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 261 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 262 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 263 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 264 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 265 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 266 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 267 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 268 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 269 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 270 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 271 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 272 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 273 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 274 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 275 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 276 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 277 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 278 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 279 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 280 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 281 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 282 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 283 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 284 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 285 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 286 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 287 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 288 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 289 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 290 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 291 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 292 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 293 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 294 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 295 Constitution. 296 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 297 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 298 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 299 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 300 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 301 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 302 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 303 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 304 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 305 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 306 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 307 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 308 reenactment by the Legislature. 309 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 310 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 311 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 312 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 313 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 314 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 315 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 316 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 317 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 318 care facilities attended by the children of current county 319 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 320 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 321 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 322 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 323 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 324 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 325 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 326 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 327 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 328 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 329 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 330 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 331 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 332 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 333 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 334 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 335 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 336 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 337 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 338 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 339 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 340 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 341 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 342 Legislature. 343 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 344 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 345 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 346 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 347 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 348 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 349 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 350 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 351 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 352 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 353 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 354 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 355 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 356 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 357 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 358 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 359 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 360 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 361 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 362 States Senate. 363 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 364 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 365 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 366 plot identification number, legal property description, 367 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 368 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 369 home address, except for the city and zip code. 370 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 371 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 372 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 373 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 374 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 375 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 376 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 377 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 378 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 379 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 380 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 381 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 382 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 383 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 384 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 385 care facility attended by the minor child. 386 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 387 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 388 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 389 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 390 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 391 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 392 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 393 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 394 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 395 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 396 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 397 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 398 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 399 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 400 status. 401 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 402 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 403 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 404 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 405 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 406 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 407 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 408 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 409 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 410 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 411 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 412 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 413 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 414 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 415 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 416 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 417 person subject to the exemption. 418 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 419 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 420 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 421 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 422 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 423 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 424 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 425 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 426 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 427 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 428 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 429 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 430 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 431 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 432 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 433 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 434 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 435 public records of the agency. 436 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 437 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 438 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 439 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 440 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 441 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 442 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 443 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 444 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 445 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 446 the party authorized to receive such information. 447 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 448 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 449 exemption. 450 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 451 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 452 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 453 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 454 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 455 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 456 with The Florida Bar. 457 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 458 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 459 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 460 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 461 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 462 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 463 must submit a written request to release the removed information 464 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 465 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 466 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 467 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 468 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 469 file number for each document containing the information to be 470 released. 471 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 472 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 473 can request the county recorder to release a protected 474 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 475 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 476 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 477 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 478 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 479 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 480 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 481 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 482 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 483 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 484 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 485 release of any document pursuant to such request. 486 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 487 744.21031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 488 744.21031âPublic records exemption.â 489 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 490 (c)ââTelephone numbersâ has the same meaning as provided in 491 s. 119.071(4)(d)1.d. s. 119.071(4)(d)1.c. 492 Section 3.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 493 necessity that the home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 494 numbers of current appellate court clerks; the names, home 495 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 496 employment of the spouses and children of such appellate court 497 clerks; and the names and locations of schools and day care 498 facilities attended by children of such appellate court clerks 499 be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 500 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. While performing 501 their duties to issue court orders, maintain case dockets, 502 answer telephone calls, respond to correspondence, and interact 503 with visitors to the courthouse, appellate court clerks may 504 incur the ill will of litigants and their associates and 505 families. As a result, current appellate court clerks and their 506 spouses and children may be targets for acts of revenge. If such 507 identifying and location information is released, the safety of 508 current appellate court clerks and their spouses and children 509 could be seriously jeopardized. For this reason, the Legislature 510 finds that it is a public necessity that such information be 511 made exempt from public records requirements. 512 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.